results/hyph_ca_ES.dic
we8alth
we1a
bo8ok
bo1o
fa8cebo8ok
fa1ce
face1bo
facebo1o
fu8erteventu1ra
fuer1te
fuerte1ve
fuerteven1tu
go8o1g2le
go1o
lou9v8re
monte9r8rey
monter1re
o8h8i8o
o1hi
ovi8e1do
o1vi
ovi1e
ra9s8hid
ra1s2hi
rey9k8javík
reyk1ja
reykja1ví
ro8osevelt
ro1o
roo1se
roose1ve
1t8wi8t9ter
t1wi
twit1te
1t8w8e8et
t1we
twe1e
unico8de
u3ni
uni1co
.1v8la
.1v8ra
1ya
yaho8o
ya1ho
.a8l9len.
debus9sy
de1bu
gan9d8hi
rousse8au
rous1se
rousse1a
1s2ha
9s8ha8ke9s8pe8a8r8e.
sha1ke
shakes3pe
shakespe1a
shakespea1re
9s8ha8ke9s8pe8a8r9i
fi8eld
fi1e
.o9k8laho1ma
.ok1la
.okla1ho
orwe8l9li
or1we
fre4elan4ce.
fre1e
free1la
freelan1ce
fre4elancer
gana4che.
ga1na
gana1c2he
gana4ches.
ha4l5lo4w5e4en
ha3l2lo
hallo1we
hallowe1e
jambore4e
jam1bo
jambo1re
mon4t5real
mon1t2re
montre1a
spring9s8te8en
s1p2ri
springs1te
springste1e
te4l5entra1da
te1le
telen1t2ra
waterlo4o
wa1te
water1lo
what4s5app
w1ha
what1sa
1yo
youtu4be.
you1tu
youtu1be
x4vi
x4x
xc4v
xl4v
1ña
1ñe
3ñi
1ño
1ñu
1ñá
1ñé
3ñí
1ñó
1ñú
1ñà
1ñè
1ñò
1ye
1yi
1yu
1yá
1yé
1yí
1yó
1yú
1yà
1yè
1yò
l2yita.
l1yi
lyi1ta
1b2ya
1b2ye
1b2yi
1b2yo
1b2yu
1v2la
1v2le
1v2li
1v2lo
1v2lu
1v2ra
1v2re
1v2ri
1v2ro
1v2ru
1c2he
1c2hi
1c2ho
1c2hu
1k2ha
1k2he
1k2hi
1k2ho
1k2hu
1k2hé
1l2ha
1l2he
1l2hi
1l2ho
1l2hu
1n2ha
1n2he
1n2hi
1n2ho
1n2hu
1p2ha
1p2he
1p2hi
1p2ho
1p2hu
1t2ha
1t2he
1t2hi
1t2ho
1t2hu
1t2hò
1s2he
1s2hi
1s2ho
1s2hu
1z2ha
1z2he
1z2hi
1z2ho
1z2hu
.ale2s3hor
.a1le
.ale1s2ho
.a2l3ho1ra
.a1l2ho
a2n3hedon
a1n2he
anhe1do
a2n3hel
2n3hidr
2s3hidr
2l3hidr
2z3hidr
2n3habil
nha1bi
2n3hàbil
n1hà
nhà1bi
2s3habil
sha1bi
2s3hàbil
s1hà
shà1bi
2n3habit
2s3habit
2s3harmon
shar1mo
2s3harmòn
shar1mò
2n3harmon
nhar1mo
2n3harmòn
nhar1mò
2l3harmon
lhar1mo
2l3harmòn
lhar1mò
2n3hist
2s3hi3po
2n3hi3po
2l3hi3po
.a2n3hipn
.a1n2hi
.a2n3hist
.be2n3ha1ja
.be1n2ha
.ma2l3ha1ja
.ma1l2ha
.be2n3ha1ge
.ma2l3ha1ge
.bo2n3ho1mi
.bo1n2ho
.bi2l3harz
.bi1l2ha
.brei2t3haupt
.brei1t2ha
de2s3herb
de1s2he
de2s3heret
deshe1re
de2s3hipotec
de1s2hi
de2s3hi3po
deshipo1te
de2s3honest
de1s2ho
desho1ne
de2s3honor
desho1no
de2s3honr
de2s3humanitz
de1s2hu
deshu1ma
deshuma3ni
.de2s3hor
.de1s2ho
.dre2t3havent
.1d2re
.dre1t2ha
.dretha1ve
e2n3herb
e1n2he
.e2n3horabon
.e1n2ho
.enho1ra
.enhora1bo
.esta4t5unid
.es1ta
.esta1tu
.estatu3ni
fi2l3hel
fi1l2he
.genti2l3ho1me
.gen1ti
.genti1l2ho
.genti2l3hòmen
.gentil1hò
.gentilhò1me
i2n3heren
i1n2he
inhe1re
i2n3herèn
inhe1rè
i2n3hi1bi
i1n2hi
i2n3honest
i1n2ho
inho1ne
i2n3hospital
inhos3pi
inhospi1ta
i2n3hal
i1n2ha
i2n3hum
i1n2hu
co2n3hort
co1n2ho
ma2l3humor
ma1l2hu
malhu1mo
male2s3herb
ma1le
male1s2he
ma2l3herb
ma1l2he
be2n3humor
be1n2hu
benhu1mo
.me2n3hir
.me1n2hi
.mi2l3ho1me
.mi1l2ho
.mi2l3hò1me
.mil1hò
.tran2s3hu1mà
.tran1s2hu
.tran2s3hu1ma
.to2t3hom
.to1t2ho
.to2t3hor
.para2t3hormon
.para1t2ho
.parathor1mo
.ca2p3huit
.ca1p2hu
.ste2p3hanià.
.s1te
.ste1p2ha
.stepha3ni
.stephani1à
.ste2p3hanian
.stephani1a
li4echten5s4tein
li1e
liech1te
liechtens1te
taig8ne.
taig1ne
pascu8al
pas1cu
pascu1a
be8e8t9hoven
be1e
bee1t2ho
beetho1ve
star8t9up
s1ta
star1tu
l·1l2y3i
2yita.
yi1ta
a3yita.
a1yi
ayi1ta
e3yita.
e1yi
eyi1ta
i3yita.
i1yi
iyi1ta
o3yita.
o1yi
oyi1ta
u3yita.
u1yi
uyi1ta
y1ïta.
yï1ta
ü3ï
ch2r
.agú3a
.a1gú
.agú3o
.agú3u
.agú3e
.agu3a
.a1gu
.agü3e
.a1gü
.agü3i
.agu3o
.agu3à
.agü3í
.agu3ï
.agü3é
-agú3a
-a1gú
-agú3o
-agú3u
-agú3e
-agu3a
-a1gu
-agü3e
-a1gü
-agü3i
-agu3o
-agu3à
-agü3í
-agü3é
.agu4ant
-agu4ant
.agu4ait
-agu4ait
.l'8s8p
.l8'8
.l'8s8c
.l'8f8t
.d'8s8p
.d8'8
.d'8s8c
.d'8f8t
.n8'8
n'8hi
n8'8
-o4est.
-o1e
6cul.
6culs.
6puta.
pu1ta
6putes.
pu1te
sud-a4
nord-a4
sud-e4
nord-e4
sud-o4
nord-o4
